fi_FI.dic
esiinnyn/Z
esitin/Z
esitän/Z
jäin/Z
jään/Z
käsittelen/Z
kävin/Z
kävisin/Z
käytin/Z
käytän/Z
liityn/Z
lyön/Z
lähden/Z
löin/Z
menen/Z
menin/Z
merkitsen/Z
määrään/Z
näen/Z
näin/Z
näytin/Z
näytän/Z
pidin/Z
pidän/Z
pyrin/Z
pääsen/Z
synnyn/Z
syön/Z
söin/Z
teen/Z
tein/Z
tiedän/Z
tiesin/Z
